Massachusetts, session 194th, H3707.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority shall not enter, renew or renegotiate any contract or subcontract for the
procurement of rolling stock for the use of public transportation if the manufacturer of the rolling
stock:
(a) is incorporated in or has manufacturing facilities in the United States; and
(b) is owned or controlled by, is a subsidiary of, or is otherwise related legally or
financially to a corporation based in a country that:
(i) is identified as a nonmarket economy country (as defined in section 771(18) of the
Tariff Act of 1930 (19 U.S.C. 1677(18))) as of the date of enactment of this subsection;
of 2

(ii) was identified by the United States Trade Representative in the most recent report
required by section 182 of the Trade Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. 2242) as a priority foreign country
under subsection (a)(2) of that section; and
(iii) is subject to monitoring by the Trade Representative under section 306 of the Trade
Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. 2416).

of 2